Vermont, session 2025-2026, H148.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. STATEWIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT; PROPOSAL; REPORT
(a) Findings.
(1) In fiscal year 2019, Vermont had the lowest student-per-school
district average in the United States, with an average of 315 students per
school district. Nationally, the average size of a school district was 3,382
students.
(2) The next lowest five states in this category had three times as many
students per school district as Vermont’s 2019 average.
VT LEG #378661 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.148
2025 Page 2 of 3
(3) In the 2023–2024 school year, Vermont had 52 supervisory unions,
118 school districts, and approximately 308 principals.
(4) The role of the voters and taxpayers is to approve school budgets and
payment of education taxes.
(5) In fiscal year 2023, the education payment for a total of 83,733
students was $157,250,000.00. In fiscal year 2023, the income yield was
$15,948.00 per equalized pupil.
(6) Between fiscal year 2004 and fiscal year 2023, total enrollment in
Vermont public schools in grades kindergarten through grade 12 decreased by
21.5 percent.
(7) Vermont has a unique education finance system with a statewide
funding formula coupled with local administration. The tax formula and
process are confusing and not easily understood. Currently, a district’s
homestead tax rates are determined by its per pupil education spending.
(8) Health care bargained on a statewide basis is more efficient than
local bargaining, and statewide bargaining on other terms of teachers’ contracts
would also be more efficient than local bargaining. Vermont lags in average
salary of teachers compared to the United States and New England.
(b) Proposal to transition to a single statewide school district. In order to
maximize the ability to provide equitable educational opportunities to the
State’s small, declining student population while also minimizing
VT LEG #378661 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.148
2025 Page 3 of 3
administrative and overhead costs, the Secretary of Education shall develop a
proposal by which the State shall transition to a single statewide school district.
In developing the proposal, the Secretary shall consider the education
governance model in Hawaii, including the positive and negative effects that
transition to the model has had on educational opportunities, outcomes, and
budgets in Hawaii and on the provision and funding of special education
services in that state. The Secretary shall also investigate the need for waivers
or other federal actions necessary to transition Vermont to a statewide school
district.
(c) Report. On or before January 15, 2026, the Secretary shall present a
detailed proposal, including a timeline, to the House and Senate Committees
on Education to transition the State to a single statewide school district by
fiscal year 2028.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378661 v.1